Utah statutes.
4-39-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Domesticated elk" means elk of the genus and species cervus elaphus, held in captivity and domestically raised for commercial purposes.

(2)  "Domesticated elk facility" means a facility where domesticated elk are raised.

(3)  "Domesticated elk product" means any carcass, part of a carcass, hide, meat, meat food product, antlers, or any part of a domesticated elk.



Enacted by Chapter 302, 1997 General Session

